Utah, session 2026, SB309.
Section 1. Section 59-2-919.1 is amended to read:59-2-919.1Effective 05/06/26Superseded 07/01/26. Notice of property valuation and tax changes.(1)In addition to the notice requirements of Section 59-2-919, the county auditor, on or before July 22 of each year, shall notify each owner of real estate who is listed on the assessment roll.(2)The notice described in Subsection (1) shall:(a)except as provided in Subsection (5)(6), be sent to all owners of real property by mail 10 or more days before the day on which:(i)the county board of equalization meets; and(ii)the taxing entity holds a public hearing on the proposed increase in the certified tax rate;(b)be on a form that is:(i)approved by the commission approves; and(ii)is uniform in content in all counties in the state; and(c)contain for each property:(i)the assessor's determination of the value of the property;(ii)the taxable value of the property;(iii)for property assessed by the county assessor assesses:(A)instructions on how the taxpayer may file an application with the county board of equalization to appeal the valuation or equalization of the property under Section 59-2-1004, including instructions for filing an application through electronic means; and(B)the deadline for the taxpayer to make an application to appeal the valuation or equalization of the property under Section 59-2-1004;(iv)for property assessed by the commission assesses: (A)instructions on how the taxpayer may file an application with the commission for a hearing on an objection to the valuation or equalization of the property under Section 59-2-1007;(B)the deadline for the taxpayer to apply to the commission for a hearing on an objection to the valuation or equalization of the property under Section 59-2-1007; and(C)a statement that the taxpayer may not appeal the valuation or equalization of the property to the county board of equalization;(v)itemized tax information for all applicable taxing entities, including:(A)the dollar amount of the taxpayer's tax liability for the property in the prior year; and(B)the dollar amount of the taxpayer's tax liability under the current rate;(vi)the following, stated separately:(A)the charter school levy described in Section 53F-2-703;(B)the multicounty assessing and collecting levy described in Subsection 59-2-1602(2);(C)the county assessing and collecting levy described in Subsection 59-2-1602(4); (D)levies for debt service voted on by the public;(E)levies imposed for special purposes under Section 10-6-133.4;(F)the combined basic rate as defined in Section 53F-2-301; and(G)if applicable, the annual payment described in Subsection 63H-1-501(4)(a);(vii)the tax impact on the property;(viii)the date, time, and place of the required public hearing for each entity;(ix)property tax information pertaining to:(A)taxpayer relief; and(B)the residential exemption described in Section 59-2-103;(x)information specifically authorized to be included on the notice under this chapter;(xi)the last property review date of the property as described in Subsection 59-2-303.1(1)(c)Section 59-2-303.1; (xii)instructions on how the taxpayer may obtain additional information regarding the valuation of the property, including the characteristics and features of the property, from:(A)a website maintained by the county; or(B)the statewide web portal developed and maintained by the Multicounty Appraisal Trust under Subsection 59-2-1606(5)(a) for uniform access to property characteristics and features; and(xiii)other information approved by the commission.(3)If a taxing entity that is subject to the notice and hearing requirements of Subsection 59-2-919(4) proposes a tax increase, the notice described in Subsection (1) shall state, in addition to the information required by Subsection (2):(a)the dollar amount of the taxpayer's tax liability if the taxing entity approves the proposed increase is approved;(b)the difference between the dollar amount of the taxpayer's tax liability if the taxing entity approves the proposed increase is approved and the dollar amount of the taxpayer's tax liability under the current rate, placed in close proximity to the information described in Subsection (2)(c)(viii); (c)the percentage increase that the dollar amount of the taxpayer's tax liability under the proposed tax rate represents as compared to the dollar amount of the taxpayer's tax liability under the current tax rate; and(d)for each taxing entity proposing a tax increase, the dollar amount of additional ad valorem tax revenue, as defined in Section 59-2-919, that would be generated each year if the taxing entity approves the proposed tax increase is approved.(4)In addition to any other tax relief information required under Subsection (2)(c)(ix)(A), a notice sent to a residential property shall:(a)state, "If you are 65 years old or older, disabled, or experiencing extreme hardship, and this property is your primary residence, you may be eligible to defer payment of this property tax."; and(b)include a telephone number, or a website address on which a telephone number is prominently listed, that the property owner may call to obtain additional information about applying for a deferral.(5)A county shall include with the notice provided on or before July 22, 2026, information about the requirement for an owner of a single-family home used as a rental to register in accordance with Section 61-2-302.(5)(6)(a)Subject to the other provisions of this Subsection (5)(6), a county auditor may provide, at the county auditor's discretion, the notice required by this section to a taxpayer by electronic means if a taxpayer makes an election, according to procedures determined by the county auditor determines, to receive the notice by electronic means.(b)(i)If a county auditor sends a notice required by this section by electronic means, the county auditor shall attempt to verify whether a taxpayer receives the notice.(ii)If the county auditor cannot verify receipt of the notice sent by electronic means 14 days or more before the county board of equalization meets and the taxing entity holds a public hearing on a proposed increase in the certified tax rate, the county auditor shall send the notice required by this section by mail as provided in Subsection (2).(c)A taxpayer may revoke an election to receive the notice required by this section by electronic means if the taxpayer provides written notice to the county auditor on or before April 30.(d)An election or a revocation of an election under this Subsection (5)(6):(i)does not relieve a taxpayer of the duty to pay a tax due under this chapter on or before the due date for paying the tax; or(ii)does not alter the requirement that a taxpayer appealing the valuation or the equalization of the taxpayer's real property submit the application for appeal within the time period provided in Subsection 59-2-1004(3).(e)A county auditor shall provide the notice required by this section as provided in Subsection (2), until a taxpayer makes a new election in accordance with this Subsection (5)(6), if:(i)the taxpayer revokes an election in accordance with Subsection (5)(c)(6)(c) to receive the notice required by this section by electronic means; or(ii)the county auditor finds that the taxpayer's electronic contact information is invalid.(f)A person is considered to be a taxpayer for purposes of this Subsection (5)(6) regardless of whether the property that is the subject of the notice required by this section is exempt from taxation.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 59-2-919.1 is amended to read:59-2-919.1Effective 07/01/26. Notice of property valuation and tax changes.(1)In addition to the notice requirements of Section 59-2-919, the county auditor, on or before July 22 of each year, shall notify each owner of real estate who is listed on the assessment roll.(2)The notice described in Subsection (1) shall:(a)except as provided in Subsection (5)(6), be sent to all owners of real property by mail 10 or more days before the day on which:(i)the county board of equalization meets; and(ii)the taxing entity holds a public hearing on the proposed increase in the certified tax rate;(b)be on a form that is:(i)approved by the commission approves; and(ii)is uniform in content in all counties in the state; and(c)contain for each property:(i)the assessor's determination of the value of the property;(ii)the taxable value of the property;(iii)for property assessed by the county assessor assesses:(A)instructions on how the taxpayer may file an application with the county board of equalization to appeal the valuation or equalization of the property under Section 59-2-1004, including instructions for filing an application through electronic means; and(B)the deadline for the taxpayer to make an application to appeal the valuation or equalization of the property under Section 59-2-1004;(iv)for property assessed by the commission assesses: (A)instructions on how the taxpayer may file an application with the commission for a hearing on an objection to the valuation or equalization of the property under Section 59-2-1007;(B)the deadline for the taxpayer to apply to the commission for a hearing on an objection to the valuation or equalization of the property under Section 59-2-1007; and(C)a statement that the taxpayer may not appeal the valuation or equalization of the property to the county board of equalization;(v)itemized tax information for all applicable taxing entities, including:(A)the dollar amount of the taxpayer's tax liability for the property in the prior year; and(B)the dollar amount of the taxpayer's tax liability under the current rate;(vi)the following, stated separately:(A)the charter school levy described in Section 53F-2-703;(B)the multicounty assessing and collecting levy described in Subsection 59-2-1602(2);(C)the county assessing and collecting levy described in Subsection 59-2-1602(4); (D)levies for debt service voted on by the public;(E)levies imposed for special purposes under Section 10-6-133.4;(F)the minimum basic tax rate as defined in Section 53F-2-301; and(G)if applicable, the annual payment described in Subsection 63H-1-501(4)(a);(vii)the tax impact on the property;(viii)the date, time, and place of the required public hearing for each entity;(ix)property tax information pertaining to:(A)taxpayer relief; and(B)the residential exemption described in Section 59-2-103;(x)information specifically authorized to be included on the notice under this chapter;(xi)the last property review date of the property as described in Subsection 59-2-303.1(1)(c)Section 59-2-303.1; (xii)instructions on how the taxpayer may obtain additional information regarding the valuation of the property, including the characteristics and features of the property, from:(A)a website maintained by the county; or(B)the statewide web portal developed and maintained by the Multicounty Appraisal Trust under Subsection 59-2-1606(5)(a) for uniform access to property characteristics and features; and(xiii)other information approved by the commission.(3)If a taxing entity that is subject to the notice and hearing requirements of Subsection 59-2-919(4) proposes a tax increase, the notice described in Subsection (1) shall state, in addition to the information required by Subsection (2):(a)the dollar amount of the taxpayer's tax liability if the taxing entity approves the proposed increase is approved;(b)the difference between the dollar amount of the taxpayer's tax liability if the taxing entity approves the proposed increase is approved and the dollar amount of the taxpayer's tax liability under the current rate, placed in close proximity to the information described in Subsection (2)(c)(viii); (c)the percentage increase that the dollar amount of the taxpayer's tax liability under the proposed tax rate represents as compared to the dollar amount of the taxpayer's tax liability under the current tax rate; and(d)for each taxing entity proposing a tax increase, the dollar amount of additional ad valorem tax revenue, as defined in Section 59-2-919, that would be generated each year if the taxing entity approves the proposed tax increase is approved.(4)In addition to any other tax relief information required under Subsection (2)(c)(ix)(A), a notice sent to a residential property shall:(a)state, "If you are 65 years old or older, disabled, or experiencing extreme hardship, and this property is your primary residence, you may be eligible to defer payment of this property tax."; and(b)include a telephone number, or a website address on which a telephone number is prominently listed, that the property owner may call to obtain additional information about applying for a deferral.(5)A county shall include with the notice provided on or before July 22, 2026, information about the requirement for an owner of a single-family home used as a rental to register in accordance with Section 61-2-302.(5)(6)(a)Subject to the other provisions of this Subsection (5)(6), a county auditor may provide, at the county auditor's discretion, the notice required by this section to a taxpayer by electronic means if a taxpayer makes an election, according to procedures determined by the county auditor determines, to receive the notice by electronic means.(b)(i)If a county auditor sends a notice required by this section by electronic means, the county auditor shall attempt to verify whether a taxpayer receives the notice.(ii)If the county auditor cannot verify receipt of the notice sent by electronic means 14 days or more before the county board of equalization meets and the taxing entity holds a public hearing on a proposed increase in the certified tax rate, the county auditor shall send the notice required by this section by mail as provided in Subsection (2).(c)A taxpayer may revoke an election to receive the notice required by this section by electronic means if the taxpayer provides written notice to the county auditor on or before April 30.(d)An election or a revocation of an election under this Subsection (5)(6):(i)does not relieve a taxpayer of the duty to pay a tax due under this chapter on or before the due date for paying the tax; or(ii)does not alter the requirement that a taxpayer appealing the valuation or the equalization of the taxpayer's real property submit the application for appeal within the time period provided in Subsection 59-2-1004(3).(e)A county auditor shall provide the notice required by this section as provided in Subsection (2), until a taxpayer makes a new election in accordance with this Subsection (5)(6), if:(i)the taxpayer revokes an election in accordance with Subsection (5)(c)(6)(c) to receive the notice required by this section by electronic means; or(ii)the county auditor finds that the taxpayer's electronic contact information is invalid.(f)A person is considered to be a taxpayer for purposes of this Subsection (5)(6) regardless of whether the property that is the subject of the notice required by this section is exempt from taxation.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 59-32-101 is amended to read:1. Oil and Gas Production Mitigation Tax Act59-32-101Effective 05/06/26. Definitions.As used in this chapterpart:(1)"Barrel" means an amount equal to 42 gallons of oil at atmospheric pressure and at a temperature of 60 degrees Fahrenheit.(2)"Condensate" means hydrocarbons, regardless of gravity, that occur naturally in the gaseous phase in the reservoir and are separated from the natural gas as liquids through the process of condensation either in the reservoir, in the wellbore, or at the surface in field separators.(3)"Crude oil" means hydrocarbons, regardless of gravity, that occur naturally in the liquid phase in the reservoir and are produced at the wellhead in liquid form.(4)"Development well" means the same atas that term is defined in Section 59-5-101.(5)(a)"Gas" means:(i)natural gas;(ii)natural gas liquids; or(iii)any mixture of natural gas and natural gas liquids.(b)"Gas" does not include any gaseous or liquid substance processed from coal, oil shale, tar sands, or any other hydrocarbon substance that occurs naturally in solid form.(6)"MCF" means an amount equal to 1,000 cubic feet of gas at a pressure of 14.73 pounds per square inch and at a temperature of 60 degrees Fahrenheit.(7)"Natural gas" means hydrocarbons, other than oil and natural gas liquids, that occur naturally in the gaseous phase in the reservoir and are produced and recovered at the wellhead in gaseous form.(8)"Natural gas liquids" means hydrocarbons, regardless of gravity, that are separated from natural gas as liquids in gas processing plants through the process of condensation, absorption, adsorption, or other methods.(9)(a)"Oil" means:(i)crude oil;(ii)condensate; or(iii)any mixture of crude oil and condensate.(b)"Oil" does not include any gaseous or liquid substance processed from coal, oil shale, tar sands, or any other hydrocarbon substance that occurs naturally in solid form.(10)(a)"Oil or gas mitigation fee" means any fee or tax, whether one-time or ongoing, that is imposed by a county imposes on oil or gas producers for purposes of mitigating the direct impacts of oil or gas production on county roads.(b)"Oil or gas mitigation fee" includes:(i)a transportation service fee or other fee established under Title 17, Chapter 27a, County Land Use, Development, and Management Act, meeting the requirements of Subsection (10)(a); and(ii)an impact fee established under Title 11, Chapter 36a, Impact Fees Act, meeting the requirements of Subsection (10)(a).(c)"Oil or gas mitigation fee" does not include the tax imposed by this chapterpart.(11)"Produced" means extracted at the wellhead.(12)"Producer" means the operator of the well from which oil or gas is produced.(13)"Qualifying road" means a paved public road that is:(a)a class B road as described in Section 72-3-103; or(b)a class C road as described in Section 72-3-104.(14)"Qualifying special service district" means a special service district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District Act, that provides construction, repair, maintenance, or improvements for public roads.(15)"Recipient county" means a county that receives revenue collected from the tax imposed by this chapterpart.(16)"Stripper well" means the same as that term is defined in Section 59-5-101.(17)"Wildcat well" means the same as that term is defined in Section 59-5-101.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 59-32-102 is amended to read:59-32-102Effective 05/06/26. Imposition of local impact mitigation tax -- Rate  -- Exemptions -- Shipment out-of-state -- Stockpiling -- Relation to other taxes -- Prohibition on county imposition of oil or gas mitigation fee.(1)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (2), a local impact mitigation tax is imposed at the rate specified in Subsection (1)(b) on the total volume of oil and gas that is:(i)produced within the state on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2029; and(ii)(A)saved;(B)sold; or(C)transported from the field from which the oil or gas was produced.(b)The rate of the tax under this chapter is:(i)5 cents per barrel of oil described in Subsection (1)(a); and(ii)1/4 cent per MCF of gas described in Subsection (1)(a).(2)The tax under this chapterpart does not apply to:(a)oil or gas produced by the United States;(b)oil or gas produced by the state or a political subdivision of the state;(c)oil or gas produced by an Indian or Indian tribe as defined in Section 9-9-101 from land under the jurisdiction of the United States;(d)oil or gas produced from a stripper well;(e)oil or gas produced from a wildcat well during the first 12 months of well production;(f)oil or gas produced from a development well during the first six months of well production; or(g)gas produced or consumed for the purpose of processing oil or gas to a marketable state by removing natural gas liquids or contaminants.(3)If oil or gas is shipped outside the state:(a)the shipment constitutes a sale; and(b)the oil or gas is subject to the tax imposed by this chapterpart.(4)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b), if oil or gas is stockpiled, the tax under this chapterpart is not imposed until the oil or gas is:(i)sold;(ii)transported; or(iii)delivered.(b)If oil or gas is stockpiled for more than two years, the oil or gas is subject to the tax imposed by this chapterpart.(5)The tax under this chapterpart:(a)is separate from and in addition to all other taxes provided by law, including the severance tax imposed under Chapter 5, Part 1, Oil and Gas Severance Tax;(b)does not affect the requirements applicable to the severance tax imposed under Chapter 5, Part 1, Oil and Gas Severance Tax, including the requirements for the disposition of severance tax revenue under Sections 59-5-116 and 59-5-119; and(c)is not a severance tax for purposes of Utah Constitution, Article XIII, Section 5, Subsection (9).(6)Unless specifically authorized by statute, a county may not impose an oil or gas mitigation fee.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 59-32-103 is amended to read:59-32-103Effective 05/06/26. Payment of tax -- Revenue distribution -- Expenditure of tax revenue -- Administration.(1)(a)The producer of oil or gas subject to the tax imposed by this chapter shall be paidpart shall pay the tax:(i)by the producer of oil or gas subject to the tax to the commission; and(ii)on a quarterly basis on or before the last day of the month following each calendar quarterly period electronically in a manner prescribed by the commission approves.(b)For purposes of this Subsection (1), the commission may require necessary information from producers regarding oil or gas production.(2)The commission shall distribute the revenue collected from the tax under this chapterpart:(a)to the county within which the revenue is collected from oil or gas production; and(b)within 60 days from the date on which the tax is paid.(3)(a)(i)If a county has created a qualifying special service district, the county treasurer shall transfer the revenue distributed to the county under Subsection (2) to the qualifying special service district.(ii)A qualifying special service district described in Subsection (3)(a)(i) shall expend the revenue as provided in Subsection (4).(b)(i)If a county has not created a qualifying special service district, the county treasurer shall deposit the revenue distributed to the county under Subsection (2) into a special revenue fund that is created to hold the revenue and is separate from the county's general fund.(ii)A county described in Subsection (3)(b)(i) shall expend the revenue as provided in Subsection (4).(4)The revenue collected from the tax under this chapterpart may only be expended for transportation projects that mitigate the direct impacts of oil or gas production on qualifying roads located within the recipient county.(5)The commission shall:(a)administer, collect, and enforce the tax under this chapterpart in accordance with Chapter 1, General Taxation Policies; and(b)retain and deposit an administrative charge in accordance with Section 59-1-306 from the revenue the commission collects from the tax under this chapterpart.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 59-32-104 is amended to read:59-32-104Effective 05/06/26. County report to Legislature.(1)Each recipient county shall submit a written report to the Natural Resources, Agriculture, and Environment Interim Committee on or before September 1, 2029.(2)The report described in Subsection (1) shall include:(a)an accounting of the county's use of revenue received by the county from the tax under this chapterpart, including information regarding each transportation project for which the revenue has provided funding;(b)for each transportation project described under Subsection (2)(a):(i)an explanation as to how the transportation project mitigates the direct impacts of oil or gas production on qualifying roads located within the county; and(ii)a description of any other funding sources in addition to the revenue from the tax under this chapter; and(c)any recommendations for legislative action to reauthorize the tax for the purpose described in Subsection 59-32-103(4).(3)The Natural Resources, Agriculture, and Environment Interim Committee shall:(a)study any recommendations provided by a recipient county under Subsection (2)(c); and(b)if the Natural Resources, Agriculture, and Environment Interim Committee decides to recommend legislative action to the Legislature, prepare legislation for consideration by the Legislature in the next general session.

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 59-32-201 is enacted to read:2. Single-family Housing Rental Excise Tax59-32-201Effective 05/06/26. Definitions.As used in this part, "single-family home" means a detached residential structure, designed to be occupied by an individual household, that the owner rents or will rent during the calendar year.

Section 8:
Section 8. Section 59-32-202 is enacted to read:59-32-202Effective 05/06/26. Imposition of excise tax.(1)Beginning in 2027, an owner that owns, in whole or in part, 25 or more single-family homes in the state is subject to an annual tax equal to:(a)for 25 to 29 single-family homes, $2,000 for each single-family home;(b)for 30 to 49 single-family homes:(i)$2,000 for each of the first five single-family homes; and(ii)$4,000 for each single-family home above 29; and(c)for 50 or more single-family homes:(i)$2,000 for each of the first five single-family homes;(ii)$4,000 for each of the next 20 single-family homes; and(iii)$6,000 for each single-family home above 49.(2)(a)An owner shall calculate the amount of tax due based on the number of single-family homes the owner owns, in whole or in part, on January 1.(b)The tax is due on April 15 of each year.(3)An owner shall submit a return and remit the tax this section imposes:(a)on or before the due date; and(b)in an electronic format the commission approves.(4)An owner shall retain records to determine the amount of tax due for the same time period a person is required to keep books and records under Section 59-1-1406.

Section 9:
Section 9. Section 59-32-203 is enacted to read:59-32-203Effective 05/06/26. Administration of tax -- Distribution of revenue -- Uses.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), the commission shall administer, collect, and enforce a tax under this chapter in accordance with Chapter 1, General Taxation Policies.(2)The commission shall transfer annually to the Division of Real Estate an amount equal to the lesser of:(a)1.5% of the revenue the commission collects under this part; or(b)the amount sufficient to cover the cost to the Division of Real Estate for administering the Residential Rental Property Registration Act.(3)The commission shall deposit the revenue the commission collects, after making the transfer described in Subsection (2), into the Housing Transition Redevelopment Fund created in Section 63N-22-102.

Section 10:
Section 10. Section 61-2-102 is amended to read:61-2-102Effective 05/06/26. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Corporation" means the same as that term is defined in Section 59-7-101.(2)"Department" means the Department of Commerce.(2)(3)"Director" means the director of the division appointed under Section 61-2-201.(3)(4)"Division" means the Division of Real Estate created in Section 61-2-201.(4)(5)"Executive director" means the executive director of the department appointed under Section 13-1-3.(6)"Owner" means:(a)an individual that reports income or loss from the rental of at least one single-family home on a federal or state income tax return; or(b)if an individual described in Subsection (6)(a) uses a property manager for property management, the property manager.(7)"Pass-through entity taxpayer" means the same as that term is defined in Section 59-10-1402.(8)"Property management" means the same as that term is defined in Section 61-2f-102.(9)"Property manager" means the same as that term is defined in Section 61-2f-102.(10)"Single-family home" means a detached residential structure, designed to be occupied by an individual household.

Section 11:
Section 11. Section 61-2-301 is enacted to read:3. Residential Rental Property Registration Act61-2-301Effective 05/06/26. Registration -- Penalty -- Notice to county assessors.(1)An owner shall register with the division each single-family home that the owner rents or manages in the state on or before the later of:(a)October 1, 2026; or(b)30 days after the day on which the owner rents the single-family home in the state.(2)The registration shall include:(a)the county and parcel identification number for each single-family home used as a rental; and(b)the name and identifying information, including mailing address or electronic address, of each corporation, pass-through entity taxpayer, or individual that receives income or loss from each single-family home used as a rental.(3)(a)An owner shall update a registration if the owner:(i)no longer owns a previously registered single-family home; or(ii)stops renting a previously registered single-family home for a period of more than three months.(b)The owner shall update the registration within 30 days after the day on which:(i)the owner sells the single-family home, or an interest in the single-family home; or(ii)the three-month period of non-rental ends.(4)(a)An owner is subject to a penalty of $100 for each month that the owner fails to register each single-family home.(b)The division shall remit penalties to the Division of Finance for deposit into the Housing Transition Redevelopment Fund created in Section 63N-22-102.(5)The division shall provide the address of each single-family home that an owner registers in accordance with this section to the county assessors for purposes of verifying compliance with Subsection 59-2-103.5(5).

Section 12:
Section 12. Section 61-2-302 is enacted to read:61-2-302Effective 05/06/26. Notice of tax obligation.(1)(a)The division shall provide notice of the obligation to pay the excise tax imposed under Section 59-32-202:(i)through signage at any physical or electronic address at which an owner may register in accordance with Section 61-2-301; and(ii)by mail, or with the owner's consent, electronic mail, to any owner the division identifies as renting 25 or more single-family homes in the state.(b)The division is not liable for mistakes in identifying an owner that rents 25 or more single-family homes in the state.(2)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division may make rules to administer the notice requirements of this section.

Section 13:
Section 13. Section 63I-1-259 is amended to read:63I-1-259Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Title 59.(1)Subsection 59-1-403(4)(aa), regarding a requirement for the State Tax Commission to inform the Department of Workforce Services whether an individual claimed a federal earned income tax credit, is repealed July 1, 2029.(2)Section 59-2-1603, Allocation of money in the Property Tax Valuation Fund -- Use of funds, is repealed July 1, 2030.(3)Section 59-5-304, Tax credit for mining exploration, is repealed July 1, 2037.(4)Section 59-7-618.1, Tax credit related to alternative fuel heavy duty vehicles, is repealed July 1, 2029.(5)Section 59-9-102.5, Offset for occupational health and safety related donations, is repealed December 31, 2030.(6)Section 59-10-1033.1, Tax credit related to alternative fuel heavy duty vehicles, is repealed July 1, 2029.(7)Subsection 59-28-103(5), regarding a tax rate on certain transactions that take place within a county of the first class, is repealed July 1, 2047.(8)Title 59, Chapter 32, Part 2, Single-family Housing Rental Excise Tax, is repealed July 1, 2032.

Section 14:
Section 14. Section 63I-1-261 is amended to read:63I-1-261Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Title 61.(1)Title 61, Chapter 2, Part 3, Residential Rental Property Registration Act, is repealed July 1, 2032.(2)Section 61-2c-104, Residential Mortgage Regulatory Commission, is repealed July 1, 2031.

Section 15:
Section 15. Section 63I-1-263 is amended to read:63I-1-263Effective 05/06/26. Repeal dates: Titles 63A to 63O.(1)Title 63C, Chapter 4a, Constitutional and Federalism Defense Act, is repealed July 1, 2028.(2)Title 63C, Chapter 18, Behavioral Health Crisis Response Committee, is repealed December 31, 2026.(3)Title 63C, Chapter 25, State Finance Review Commission, is repealed July 1, 2027.(4)Title 63C, Chapter 27, Cybersecurity Commission, is repealed July 1, 2032.(5)Title 63C, Chapter 28, Ethnic Studies Commission, is repealed July 1, 2026.(6)Title 63C, Chapter 31, State Employee Benefits Advisory Commission, is repealed July 1, 2028.(7)Section 63G-6a-805, Purchase from community rehabilitation programs, is repealed July 1, 2026.(8)Title 63G, Chapter 21, Agreements to Provide State Services, is repealed July 1, 2028.(9)Title 63H, Chapter 4, Heber Valley Historic Railroad Authority, is repealed July 1, 2029.(10)Subsection 63J-1-602.2(16), related to the Communication Habits to reduce Adolescent Threats (CHAT) Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2029.(11)Subsection 63J-1-602.2(26), regarding the Utah Seismic Safety Commission, is repealed January 1, 2025.(12)Section 63L-11-204, Canyon resource management plan, is repealed July 1, 2027.(13)Title 63L, Chapter 11, Part 4, Resource Development Coordinating Committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(14)Title 63M, Chapter 7, Part 7, Domestic Violence Offender Treatment Board, is repealed July 1, 2027.(15)Section 63M-7-902, Creation -- Membership -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Expenses, is repealed July 1, 2029.(16)Title 63M, Chapter 11, Utah Commission on Aging, is repealed July 1, 2026.(17)Title 63N, Chapter 2, Part 2, Enterprise Zone Act, is repealed July 1, 2028.(18)Subsection 63N-2-511(1)(b), regarding the Board of Tourism Development, is repealed July 1, 2030.(19)Section 63N-2-512, Hotel Impact Mitigation Fund, is repealed July 1, 2028.(20)Title 63N, Chapter 3, Part 9, Strategic Innovation Grant Pilot Program, is repealed July 1, 2027.(21)Title 63N, Chapter 3, Part 11, Manufacturing Modernization Grant Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(22)Title 63N, Chapter 4, Part 4, Rural Employment Expansion Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(23)Section 63N-4-804, Rural Opportunity Advisory Committee, is repealed July 1, 2027.(24)Subsection 63N-4-805(5)(b), regarding the Rural Employment Expansion Program, is repealed July 1, 2028.(25)Subsection 63N-7-101(1), regarding the Board of Tourism Development, is repealed July 1, 2030.(26)Subsection 63N-7-102(3)(c), regarding a requirement for the Utah Office of Tourism to receive approval from the Board of Tourism Development, is repealed July 1, 2030.(27)Title 63N, Chapter 7, Part 2, Board of Tourism Development, is repealed July 1, 2030.(28)Title 63N, Chapter 22, Housing Transition Redevelopment Grant Program, is repealed July 1, 2032.

Section 16:
Section 16. Section 63N-22-101 is enacted to read:22. Housing Transition Redevelopment Grant Program63N-22-101Effective 05/06/26. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Attainable home" means a single-family home that costs the purchaser no more than the amount a qualifying residential unit may be purchased for in accordance with Section 63H-8-501.(2)"Deed-restricted property" means an attainable home that is subject to a recorded covenant running with the land that requires the property to be an owner-occupied single-family home.(3)"Fund" means the Housing Transition Redevelopment Fund created in Section 63N-22-102.(4)"Grant program" means the Housing Transition Redevelopment Grant Program created in Section 63N-22-103.(5)"Institutional investor" means a person that reports income or loss from the rental of at least 25 single-family homes in the state on the federal or state income tax return.(6)"Municipality" means the same as that term is defined in Section 10-1-104.(7)"Owner-occupied" means an owner uses as a primary residence for at least 10 months of the calendar year.(8)"Project area" means the same as that term is defined in Section 17C-1-102.(9)"Qualified transition zone" means:(a)a geographic area in which one or more institutional owners own, in whole or in part, at least 25% of the single-family homes; or(b)a project area.(10)"Single-family home" means a detached residential structure, designed to be occupied by an individual household.

Section 17:
Section 17. Section 63N-22-102 is enacted to read:63N-22-102Effective 05/06/26. Housing Transition Redevelopment Fund.(1)There is created an expendable special revenue fund, known as the "Housing Transition Redevelopment Fund."(2)The fund shall consist of:(a)tax revenue from the excise tax imposed by Section 59-32-202; and(b)penalties the Division of Real Estate imposes and deposits in accordance with Section 61-2-301.(3)The office shall use money in the fund for the grant program.

Section 18:
Section 18. Section 63N-22-103 is enacted to read:63N-22-103Effective 05/06/26. Housing Transition Redevelopment Grant Program.(1)To facilitate a targeted and locally driven conversion of single-family rental housing owned by institutional investors to owner-occupied attainable homes, there is established the Housing Transition Redevelopment Grant Program to award grants to municipalities for use in a qualified transition zone.(2)(a)The office shall administer the grant program.(b)The office may use no more than 10% of funds within the grant program for administration costs.(3)(a)A municipality submitting an application for a grant to the office shall include:(i)the location of the qualified transition zone and evidence that the municipality used to identify the area as suitable for transitioning to owner-occupied attainable homes;(ii)the requested grant amount;(iii)a commitment, as evidenced by the municipality adopting a resolution:(A)to rezone or subdivide land to transition single-family homes from institutional investor ownership to owner-occupied attainable homes within the qualified transition zone;(B)to require, as conditions of approving development within the qualified investment zone, that the developer sell the property as a deed-restricted property and prohibit homeowner association fees; and(C)to provide matching funding at a minimum of 20% of the requested grant amount;(iv)a detailed budget for use of a grant and matching funds;(v)if the municipality submits an application for an additional grant amount after an initial grant, evidence of a decrease in the number of single-family homes owned by an institutional investor within the qualified transition zone since the initial grant; and(vi)other information the office determines necessary to evaluate the application.(b)When evaluating an application for a grant, the office shall consider:(i)the likelihood the municipality's proposal will accomplish the purpose described in Subsection (1);(ii)the cost of the proposal;(iii)the extent to which any matching funding sources or existing or planned partnerships may benefit the proposal; and(iv)the viability and sustainability of the proposal.(4)(a)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the office shall make rules governing:(i)subject to Subsection (4)(b), the uses for which a municipality may spend a grant to accomplish the purpose described in Subsection (1);(ii)the form and process for submitting an application for a grant to the office;(iii)the method and formula for determining a grant amount;(iv)the method for prioritizing grant applications;(v)the monitoring of a grant recipient's compliance with conditions of the grant program; and(vi)reporting requirements for a grant recipient.(b)A municipality that receives a grant may not use grant funds to:(i)facilitate ownership of a single-family home from one institutional investor to another;(ii)subsidize development of market-rate rentals if the development:(A)does not include a requirement for rental units that are affordable housing, as that term is defined in Section 35A-8-501; or(B)facilitates institutional investor ownership of single-family homes;(iii)assist institutional investors with payment of taxes due under Title 59, Chapter 32, Part 2, Single-family Housing Rental Excise Tax; or(iv)provide funding to a development that is not zoned or approved for development in accordance with Subsection (3)(a)(iii).(5)A municipality that receives a grant shall repay the amount of the grant if the municipality:(a)waives, releases, or modifies a deed restriction on deed-restricted property; or(b)misuses grant funds.(6)On or before January 1, April 1, July 1, and October 1 of each year, the office shall post on the office's website a report that includes:(a)the location of each qualified transition zone for which a municipality receives a grant;(b)residence ownership data within a qualified transition zone for which a municipality receives a grant;(c)data on attainable homes created within the qualified transition zone, including:(i)the number of deed-restricted properties and the number of single-family homes that are rentals; and(ii)the affordability of single-family homes;(d)the number of grant applications, including:(i)the ratio of grant approvals and denials; and(ii)for the applications denied, the reasons for the denial;(e)the dollar amount the office grants to each grant recipient;(f)administrative costs as a percentage of total funds within the grant program; and(g)emerging trends or unintended market effects from the award of grants.(7)The office shall include in the annual report to the Legislature required by Section 63N-1a-306:(a)a summary of the information posted on the office's website in accordance with Subsection (6);(b)an analysis of the grant program's effectiveness in accomplishing the purpose described in Subsection (1);(c)the geographic distribution of grant recipients; and(d)any barrier to implementation or other recommendations for adjustments to the grant program.

Section 19:
Section 20.  Effective Date.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (2), this bill takes effect May 6, 2026.(2)The actions affecting Section 59-2-919.1 (Effective 07/01/26) take effect on July 1, 2026.